Illinois, session 104th, SB117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The PFAS Reduction Act is amended by changing 5Section 5 and by adding Section 45 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 170/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 9Agency.10    "Class B firefighting foam" means foam designed to 11extinguish flammable liquid fires or prevent the ignition of 12flammable liquids.13    "Cookware" means durable houseware items used to prepare, 14dispense, or store food, foodstuffs, or beverages. "Cookware" 15includes, but is not limited to, pots, pan, skillets, grills, 16baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls, and cooking 17utensils.18    "Cosmetics" means articles:19        (1) intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or 20    sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the 21    human body or any part of the human body for the purpose of 22    cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or 23    altering the appearance; or  SB0117- 2 -LRB104 03581 BDA 13605 b1        (2) intended for use as a component of any article 2    under paragraph (1).3    "Cosmetics" includes soap and any other article under 4paragraphs (1) or (2) of this definition. 5    "Dental Floss" means a cord or cords of thin filaments 6used in interdental cleaning to remove debris and dental 7plaque from between teeth.8    "Fire department" means the duly authorized fire 9protection organization of a unit of local government, a 10Regional Fire Protection Agency, a fire protection district, 11or a volunteer fire department.12    "Food packaging" or "food contact product" means a 13container applied to or providing a means to market, protect, 14handle, deliver, serve, contain, or store a food or beverage. 15"Food packaging" or "food contact product" includes:16        (1) a unit package, an intermediate package, and a 17    shipping container;18        (2) unsealed receptacles, such as carrying cases, 19    crates, cups, plates, bowls, pails, rigid foil and other 20    trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags, and tubs; and21        (3) an individually assembled part of a food package, 22    such as any interior or exterior blocking, bracing, 23    cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior strapping, 24    coatings, closures, inks, and labels.25    "Intentionally added PFAS" means PFAS deliberately added 26during, or reasonably anticipated to be present in, the   SB0117- 3 -LRB104 03581 BDA 13605 b1manufacture of a product or its final packaging.2    "Intimate apparel" means garments intended to be worn 3under clothes usually with direct contact with skin. "Intimate 4apparel" includes, but is not limited to, bras, briefs, 5shapewear, sleepwear, thermals, loungewear, socks, and 6stockings.7    "Juvenile product" means a product designed or marketed 8for use by infants and children under 12 years of age. 9"Juvenile product" includes, but is not limited to, a baby or 10toddler foam pillow, bassinet, bedside sleeper, booster seat, 11changing pad, child restraint system for use in a motor 12vehicle and aircraft, co-sleeper, crib mattress, highchair, 13highchair pad, infant bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, 14infant sleep positioner, infant swing, infant travel bed, 15infant walker, nap cot, nursing pad, nursing pillow, play mat, 16playpen, play yard, polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow, 17portable foam nap mat, portable infant sleeper, portable 18hook-on chair, soft-sided portable crib, stroller, and toddler 19mattress. "Juvenile product" does not include a children's 20electronic product, including a personal computer, audio and 21video equipment, calculator, wireless phone, game console, 22handheld device incorporating a video screen, or any 23associated peripheral, such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply 24unit, power cord, adult mattress, or an internal component of 25a product that would not come into direct contact with a 26child's skin or mouth during reasonably foreseeable use and   SB0117- 4 -LRB104 03581 BDA 13605 b1abuse of the product.2    "Local government" means a unit of local government or 3other special purpose district that provides firefighting 4services.5    "Manufacturer" means a person that manufactures Class B 6firefighting foam and any agents of that person, including an 7importer, distributor, authorized servicer, factory branch, or 8distributor branch.9    "Menstrual product" means a product used to collect 10menstruation and vaginal discharge, including, but not limited 11to, tampons, pads, sponges, menstruation underwear, disks, and 12menstrual cups, whether disposable or reusable.13    "Perfluoroalkyl substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 14"PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals 15containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.16    "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, 17public or private corporation, limited liability company, or 18any other type of legal or commercial entity, including, but 19not limited to, members, managers, partners, directors, or 20officers.21    "Product" means an item manufactured, assembled, packaged, 22or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including, but 23not limited to, its product components, sold or distributed 24for personal, residential, commercial, or industrial use, 25including for use in making other products.26    "Testing" means calibration testing, conformance testing,   SB0117- 5 -LRB104 03581 BDA 13605 b1and fixed system testing.2(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.) 3    (415 ILCS 170/45 new)4    Sec. 45. Other banned products; other civil penalties; 5enforcement.6    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a person may not sell, 7offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this State the 8following products if the product contains intentionally added 9PFAS:10        (1) cookware;11        (2) cosmetics;12        (3) dental floss;13        (4) juvenile products;14        (5) menstrual products;15        (6) intimate apparel; or16        (7) food packaging or food contact products.17    (b) A person, other than a manufacturer subject to Section 1835 of this Act, who knowingly violates this Section is subject 19to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for the first violation 20and a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each subsequent 21violation. Civil penalties collected under this Section must 22be deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund to 23be used in accordance with the provisions of the Environmental 24Protection Trust Fund Act.25    (c) This Act and the civil penalties in this Act may be   SB0117- 6 -LRB104 03581 BDA 13605 b1enforced by the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of 2the county where the violation occurs by bringing an action in 3the name of the People of the State of Illinois in a court of 4competent jurisdiction alleging a violation of this Act. 5Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the Attorney 6General or the State's Attorney of the county where the 7violation occurs from seeking equitable remedies or other 8remedies in common law, in State or federal statute, or in 9State or federal rules or regulations to enforce or in 10connection with the enforcement of this Act, any part of this 11Act, or in remedying harm from any action or omission in 12violation of this Act or in violation of common law, State or 13federal statute, or State or federal rules or regulations.